Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 2. Elective Share of Surviving Spouse.

Sec. 13.12.201.
Definitions.

In AS

13.12.201

—

13.12.204

and

13.12.206

—

13.12.214

, “decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others” means the amounts that are included in the augmented estate under AS

13.12.205

.

In AS

13.12.201

—

13.12.214

,

“fractional interest in property held in joint tenancy with the right of survivorship,” whether the fractional interest is unilaterally severable or not, means the fraction, the numerator of which is one and the denominator of which, if the decedent was a joint tenant, is one plus the number of joint tenants who survive the decedent, and which, if the decedent was not a joint tenant, is the number of joint tenants;

“marriage,” as it relates to a transfer by the decedent during marriage, means a marriage of the decedent to the decedent’s surviving spouse;

“nonadverse party” means a person who does not have a substantial beneficial interest in the trust or other property arrangement that would be adversely affected by the exercise or nonexercise of the power that the person possesses respecting the trust or other property arrangement; a person having a general power of appointment over property is considered to have a beneficial interest in the property;

“power” or “power of appointment” includes a power to designate the beneficiary of a beneficiary designation;

“presently exercisable general power of appointment” means a power of appointment under which, at the time in question, the decedent, whether or not the decedent then had the capacity to exercise the power, held a power to create a present or future interest in the decedent, the decedent’s creditors, the decedent’s estate, or the creditors of the decedent’s estate, and includes a power to revoke or invade the principal of a trust or another property arrangement;

“probate estate” means property that would pass by intestate succession if the decedent died without a valid will;

“property” includes values subject to a beneficiary designation;

“right to income” includes a right to payments under a commercial or private annuity, an annuity trust, a unitrust, or a similar arrangement;

“transfer,” as it relates to a transfer by or of the decedent, includes

an exercise or release of a presently exercisable general power of appointment held by the decedent;

a lapse at death of a presently exercisable general power of appointment held by the decedent; and

an exercise, release, or lapse of

a general power of appointment that the decedent created in the decedent; and

a power described in AS

13.12.205(a)(2)(B)

that the decedent conferred on a nonadverse party.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 64 SLA 2010)

Sec. 13.12.202.
Elective share.

The surviving spouse of a decedent who dies domiciled in this state has a right of election, under the limitations and conditions stated in AS

13.12.201

—

13.12.214

, to take an elective share amount equal to one-third of the augmented estate.

If the sum of the amounts described in AS

13.12.207

,

13.12.209(a)(1)

, and that part of the elective share amount payable from the decedent’s probate estate and nonprobate transfers to others under AS

13.12.209(b)

— (c) is less than $50,000, the surviving spouse is entitled to a supplemental elective share amount equal to $50,000, minus the sum of the amounts described in AS

13.12.207

and

13.12.209(a)(1)

, (b), and (c). The supplemental elective share amount is payable from the decedent’s probate estate and from recipients of the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others in the order of priority set out in AS

13.12.209(b)

— (c).

If the right of election is exercised by or on behalf of the surviving spouse, the surviving spouse’s homestead allowance, exempt property, and family allowance, if any, are not charged against but are in addition to the elective share and supplemental elective share amounts.

The right, if any, of the surviving spouse of a decedent who dies domiciled outside this state to take an elective share in property in this state is governed by the law of the decedent’s domicile at death.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.203.
Composition of the augmented estate.

Subject to AS

13.12.208

, the value of the augmented estate, to the extent provided in AS

13.12.204

—

13.12.207

, consists of the sum of the values of all property, whether real or personal, movable or immovable, tangible or intangible, wherever situated, that constitute the decedent’s net probate estate, the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others, the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to the surviving spouse, and the surviving spouse’s property and nonprobate transfers to others.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.204.
Decedent’s net probate estate.

The value of the augmented estate includes the value of the decedent’s probate estate, reduced by funeral and administration expenses, homestead allowance, family allowances, exempt property, and enforceable claims.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.205.
Decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others.

The value of the augmented estate includes the value of the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others, not included under AS

13.12.204

, of any of the following types, in the amount provided respectively for each type of transfer:

property owned or owned in substance by the decedent immediately before death that passed outside probate at the decedent’s death; property included under this category consists of

property over which the decedent alone, immediately before death, held a presently exercisable general power of appointment; the amount included is the value of the property subject to the power, to the extent the property passed at the decedent’s death, by exercise, release, lapse, default, or otherwise, to or for the benefit of a person other than the decedent’s estate or surviving spouse;

the decedent’s fractional interest in property held by the decedent in joint tenancy with the right of survivorship; the amount included is the value of the decedent’s fractional interest, to the extent that the fractional interest passed by right of survivorship at the decedent’s death to a surviving joint tenant other than the decedent’s surviving spouse;

the decedent’s ownership interest in property or accounts held in pay on death, transfer on death, or co-ownership registration with the right of survivorship; the amount included is the value of the decedent’s ownership interest, to the extent the decedent’s ownership interest passed at the decedent’s death to or for the benefit of a person other than the decedent’s estate or surviving spouse;

proceeds of insurance, including accidental death benefits, on the life of the decedent, if the decedent owned the insurance policy immediately before death or if and to the extent the decedent alone and immediately before death held a presently exercisable general power of appointment over the policy or its proceeds; the amount included is the value of the proceeds, to the extent the proceeds were payable at the decedent’s death to or for the benefit of a person other than the decedent’s estate or surviving spouse;

property transferred in any of the following forms by the decedent during marriage:

an irrevocable transfer in which the decedent retained the right to the possession or enjoyment of, or to the income from, the property, if and to the extent the decedent’s right terminated at or continued beyond the decedent’s death; the amount included is the value of the fraction of the property to which the decedent’s right related, to the extent the fraction of the property passed outside probate to or for the benefit of a person other than the decedent’s estate or surviving spouse;

a transfer in which the decedent created a power over the income or property, exercisable by the decedent alone or in conjunction with another person, or exercisable by a nonadverse party, to or for the benefit of the decedent, the decedent’s creditors, the decedent’s estate, or creditors of the decedent’s estate; the amount included with respect to a power over property is the value of the property subject to the power, and the amount included with respect to a power over income is the value of the property that produces or produced the income, to the extent the power in either case was exercisable at the decedent’s death to or for the benefit of a person other than the decedent’s surviving spouse or to the extent the property passed at the decedent’s death, by exercise, release, lapse, default, or otherwise, to or for the benefit of a person other than the decedent’s estate or surviving spouse; if the power is a power over both income and property and the preceding provision defining the amount included produces different amounts, the amount included is the greater amount; and

property that passed during marriage and during the two-year period next preceding the decedent’s death as a result of a transfer by the decedent if the transfer was of any of the following types:

property that passed as a result of the termination of a right or interest in, or power over, property that would have been included in the augmented estate under (1)(A), (B), or (C) or (2) of this subsection, if the right, interest, or power had not terminated until the decedent’s death; the amount included is the value of the property that would have been included under (1)(A), (B), or (C) or (2) of this subsection, if the property were valued at the time the right, interest, or power terminated, and is included only to the extent the property passed upon termination to or for the benefit of a person other than the decedent or the decedent’s estate, spouse, or surviving spouse; as used in this subparagraph, termination, with respect to a right or interest in property, occurs when the right or interest terminated by the terms of the governing instrument or the decedent transferred or relinquished the right or interest, and, with respect to a power over property, occurs when the power terminated by exercise, release, lapse, default, or otherwise, but, with respect to a power described in (1)(A) of this subsection, termination occurs when the power terminated by exercise or release, but not otherwise;

a transfer of or relating to an insurance policy on the life of the decedent if the proceeds would have been included in the augmented estate under (1)(D) of this subsection had the transfer not occurred; the amount included is the value of the insurance proceeds to the extent the proceeds were payable at the decedent’s death to or for the benefit of a person other than the decedent’s estate or surviving spouse;

a transfer of property, to the extent not otherwise included in the augmented estate, made to or for the benefit of a person other than the decedent’s surviving spouse; the amount included is the value of the property transferred to a person to the extent that the aggregate transfers to that person in either of the two years exceeded $10,000.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, the augmented estate does not include property transferred to an irrevocable trust with a transfer restriction under AS

34.40.110(a)

if

the settlor is a discretionary beneficiary of the trust; and

the transfer was made more than 30 days before the marriage, or the decedent’s spouse consented to the transfer under AS

13.12.208(a)(2)

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 6 SLA 1997; am §§ 3, 4 ch 64 SLA 2010)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 9, ch. 6, SLA 1997 provides that the 1997 amendment to this section “does not apply to a trust unless the trust is created on or after April 2, 1997.”

Sec. 13.12.206.
Decedent’s nonprobate transfers to the surviving spouse.

Excluding property passing to the surviving spouse under 42 U.S.C. 301 — 1397f (Social Security Act), the value of the augmented estate includes the value of the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to the decedent’s surviving spouse, which consist of all property that passed outside probate at the decedent’s death from the decedent to the surviving spouse by reason of the decedent’s death, including

the decedent’s fractional interest in property held as a joint tenant with the right of survivorship, to the extent that the decedent’s fractional interest passed to the surviving spouse as surviving joint tenant;

the decedent’s ownership interest in property or accounts held in co-ownership registration with the right of survivorship, to the extent the decedent’s ownership interest passed to the surviving spouse as surviving co-owner; and

all other property that would have been included in the augmented estate under AS

13.12.205(a)(1)

or (2) had it passed to or for the benefit of a person other than the decedent’s spouse, the decedent’s surviving spouse, the decedent, or the decedent’s creditors, estate, or estate creditors.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996; am § 5 ch 64 SLA 2010)

Sec. 13.12.207.
Surviving spouse’s property and nonprobate transfers to others.

Except to the extent included in the augmented estate under AS

13.12.204

or

13.12.206

, the value of the augmented estate includes the value of

property that was owned by the decedent’s surviving spouse at the decedent’s death, including

the surviving spouse’s fractional interest in property held in joint tenancy with the right of survivorship;

the surviving spouse’s ownership interest in property or accounts held in co-ownership registration with the right of survivorship; and

property that passed to the surviving spouse by reason of the decedent’s death, but not including the spouse’s right to homestead allowance, family allowance, exempt property, or payments under 42 U.S.C. 301 — 1397f (Social Security Act); and

property that would have been included in the surviving spouse’s nonprobate transfers to others, other than the spouse’s fractional and ownership interests included under (1)(A) or (B) of this subsection, had the spouse been the decedent.

Property included under this section is valued at the decedent’s death, taking the fact that the decedent predeceased the spouse into account, but, for purposes of (a)(1)(A) and (B) of this section, the values of the spouse’s fractional and ownership interests are determined immediately before the decedent’s death if the decedent was then a joint tenant or a co-owner of the property or accounts. For purposes of (a)(2) of this section, proceeds of insurance that would have been included in the spouse’s nonprobate transfers to others under AS

13.12.205(a)(1)(D)

are not valued as if the spouse were deceased.

The value of property included under this section is reduced by enforceable claims against the surviving spouse.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996; am § 6 ch 64 SLA 2010)

Sec. 13.12.208.
Exclusions, valuation, and overlapping application.

The value of property is excluded from the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others

to the extent the decedent received adequate and full consideration in money or money’s worth for a transfer of the property; or

if the property was transferred with the written joinder of, or if the transfer was consented to in writing by, the surviving spouse.

The value of property

included in the augmented estate under AS

13.12.205

,

13.12.206

, or

13.12.207

is reduced in each category by enforceable claims against the included property; and

includes the commuted value of any present or future interest and the commuted value of amounts payable under a trust, life insurance settlement option, annuity contract, public or private pension, disability compensation, death benefit or retirement plan, or any similar arrangement, exclusive of 42 U.S.C. 301 — 1397f (Social Security Act).

In case of overlapping application to the same property of the provisions of AS

13.12.205

,

13.12.206

, or

13.12.207

, the property is included in the augmented estate under the provision yielding the greatest value, and under only one overlapping provision if all of the overlapping provisions yield the same value.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, the value of community property under AS 34.77 is not included in the augmented estate.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

The reference to “AS 34.77” in subsection (d) was substituted for “AS 34.75” in 1998 to reflect the 1998 renumbering of the chapter.

Sec. 13.12.209.
Sources from which elective share payable.

In a proceeding for an elective share, the following are applied first to satisfy the elective share amount and to reduce or eliminate any contributions due from the decedent’s probate estate and recipients of the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others:

amounts included in the augmented estate under AS

13.12.204

that pass or have passed to the surviving spouse by testate or intestate succession, and amounts included in the augmented estate under AS

13.12.206

; and

amounts included in the augmented estate under AS

13.12.207

, up to two-thirds of the augmented estate.

If, after the application of (a) of this section, the elective share amount is not fully satisfied or the surviving spouse is entitled to a supplemental elective share amount, amounts included in the decedent’s probate estate and in the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others, other than amounts included under AS

13.12.205(a)(3)(A)

or (C), are applied first to satisfy the unsatisfied balance of the elective share amount or the supplemental elective share amount. The decedent’s probate estate and that portion of the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others shall be applied so that liability for the unsatisfied balance of the elective share amount or for the supplemental elective share amount is equitably apportioned among the recipients of the decedent’s probate estate and of that portion of the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others in proportion to the value of the recipients’ interests in the decedent’s probate estate and that portion of the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others.

If, after the application of (a) and (b) of this section, the elective share or supplemental elective share amount is not fully satisfied, the remaining portion of the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others shall be applied so that liability for the unsatisfied balance of the elective share or supplemental elective share amount is equitably apportioned among the recipients of that remaining portion of the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others in proportion to the value of the recipients’ interests in the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996; am § 7 ch 64 SLA 2010)

Sec. 13.12.210.
Personal liability of recipients.

Only original recipients of the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others, and the donees of the recipients of the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others, to the extent the donees have the property or its proceeds, are liable to make a proportional contribution toward satisfaction of the surviving spouse’s elective share or supplemental elective share amount. A person liable to make contribution may choose to give up the person’s proportional part of the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others or to pay the value of the amount for which the person is liable.

If a provision of AS

13.12.201

—

13.12.214

is preempted by federal law with respect to a payment, an item of property, or another benefit included in the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others, a person who, not for value, receives the payment, item of property, or other benefit is obligated to return the payment, item of property, or benefit, or is personally liable for the amount of the payment or the value of that item of property or benefit, as provided in AS

13.12.209

, to the person who would have been entitled to it if that provision were not preempted.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.211.
Proceeding for elective share; time limit.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, the election shall be made by filing in the court and mailing or delivering to the personal representative, if any, a petition for the elective share within nine months after the date of the decedent’s death, or within six months after the probate of the decedent’s will, whichever limitation expires later. The surviving spouse shall give notice of the time and place set for hearing to persons interested in the estate and to the distributees and recipients of portions of the augmented estate whose interests will be adversely affected by the taking of the elective share. Except as provided in (b) of this section, the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others are not included within the augmented estate for the purpose of computing the elective share if the petition is filed more than nine months after the decedent’s death.

Within nine months after the decedent’s death, the surviving spouse may petition the court for an extension of time for making an election. If, within nine months after the decedent’s death, the spouse gives notice of the petition to all persons interested in the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others, the court for cause shown by the surviving spouse may extend the time for election. If the court grants the spouse’s petition for an extension, the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others are not excluded from the augmented estate for the purpose of computing the elective share and supplemental elective share amounts, if the spouse makes an election by filing in the court and mailing or delivering to the personal representative, if any, a petition for the elective share within the time allowed by the extension.

The surviving spouse may withdraw the surviving spouse’s demand for an elective share at any time before entry of a final determination by the court.

After notice and hearing, the court shall determine the elective share and supplemental elective share amounts, and shall order payment of these amounts from the assets of the augmented estate or by contribution as appears appropriate under AS

13.12.209

and

13.12.210

. If it appears that a fund or property included in the augmented estate has not come into the possession of the personal representative, or has been distributed by the personal representative, the court nevertheless shall fix the liability of a person who has an interest in the fund or property or who has possession of the fund or the property, whether as trustee or otherwise. The proceeding may be maintained against fewer than all persons against whom relief could be sought, but a person is not subject to contribution in a greater amount than the person would have been under AS

13.12.209

and

13.12.210

if relief had been secured against all persons subject to contribution.

An order or judgment of the court may be enforced as necessary in suit for contribution or payment in other courts of this state or other jurisdictions.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.212.
Right of election personal to surviving spouse; incapacitated surviving spouse.

The right of election may be exercised only by a surviving spouse who is living when the petition for the elective share is filed in the court under AS

13.12.211(a)

. If the election is not exercised by the surviving spouse personally, it may be exercised on the surviving spouse’s behalf by the surviving spouse’s conservator, guardian, or agent under the authority of a power of attorney.

If the election is exercised on behalf of a surviving spouse who is an incapacitated person, the portion of the elective share and supplemental elective share amounts due from the decedent’s probate estate and recipients of the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others under AS

13.12.209(b)

and (c) shall be placed in a custodial trust for the benefit of the surviving spouse under AS 13.60 (Alaska Uniform Custodial Trust Act), except as provided in (c) — (e) of this section. For the purposes of this subsection, an election on behalf of a surviving spouse by an agent under a durable power of attorney is presumed to be on behalf of a surviving spouse who is an incapacitated person. For the purposes of the custodial trust established by this subsection,

the electing guardian, conservator, or agent is the custodial trustee;

the surviving spouse is the beneficiary; and

the custodial trust is determined to have been created by the decedent spouse by written transfer that takes effect at the decedent spouse’s death and that directs the custodial trustee to administer the custodial trust as for an incapacitated beneficiary.

An incapacitated beneficiary or a person acting on behalf of an incapacitated beneficiary may not terminate a custodial trust established under (b) of this section; but if the beneficiary regains capacity, the beneficiary then acquires the power to terminate the custodial trust by delivering to the custodial trustee a writing signed by the beneficiary declaring the termination. If not previously terminated, the custodial trust terminates on the death of the beneficiary.

Expenditures by the custodial trustee of the property of a custodial trust established under (b) of this section shall be made with regard to other support, income, and property of the beneficiary and benefits of medical or other forms of assistance from any state or federal government or governmental agency for which the beneficiary must qualify on the basis of need.

Upon the beneficiary’s death, the custodial trustee shall transfer the unexpended property of a custodial trust established under (b) of this section in the following order:

under the residuary clause, if any, of the will of the beneficiary’s predeceased spouse against whom the elective share was taken, as if the predeceased spouse died immediately after the beneficiary;

to the predeceased spouse’s heirs under AS

13.12.711

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.213.
Waiver of right to elect and of other rights.

The right of election of a surviving spouse and the rights of the surviving spouse to homestead allowance, exempt property, and family allowance, or to any of them, may be waived, wholly or partially, before or after marriage, by a written contract, agreement, or waiver signed by the surviving spouse.

A surviving spouse’s waiver is not enforceable if the surviving spouse proves that

the surviving spouse did not execute the waiver voluntarily; or

the waiver was unconscionable when it was executed and, before execution of the waiver, the surviving spouse

was not provided a fair and reasonable disclosure of the property or financial obligations of the decedent;

did not voluntarily and expressly waive, in writing, a right to disclosure of the property or financial obligations of the decedent beyond the disclosure provided; and

did not have, or reasonably could not have had, an adequate knowledge of the property or financial obligations of the decedent.

An issue of unconscionability of a waiver is for decision by the court as a matter of law.

Unless it provides to the contrary, a waiver of “all rights,” or equivalent language, in the property or estate of a present or prospective spouse or a complete property settlement entered into after or in anticipation of separation or divorce is a waiver of all rights of elective share, homestead allowance, exempt property, and family allowance by each spouse in the property of the other and a renunciation by each of all benefits that would otherwise pass to the spouse from the other by intestate succession or by virtue of a will executed before the waiver or property settlement.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)

Sec. 13.12.214.
Protection of payors and other third parties.

Although under AS

13.12.205

a payment, item of property, or other benefit is included in the decedent’s nonprobate transfers to others, a payor or other third party is not liable for having made a payment or transferred an item of property or other benefit to a beneficiary designated in a governing instrument, or for having taken other action in good faith reliance on the validity of a governing instrument, upon request and satisfactory proof of the decedent’s death, before the payor or other third party received written notice from the surviving spouse or spouse’s representative of an intention to file a petition for the elective share or that a petition for the elective share has been filed. A payor or other third party is liable for payments made or other actions taken after the payor or other third party received written notice of an intention to file a petition for the elective share or that a petition for the elective share has been filed.

The written notice under (a) of this section of intention to file a petition for the elective share or that a petition for the elective share has been filed shall be mailed to the payor’s or other third party’s main office or home by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, or served upon the payor or other third party in the same manner as a summons in a civil action. Upon receipt of written notice of intention to file a petition for the elective share or that a petition for the elective share has been filed, a payor or other third party may pay any amount owed or transfer or deposit an item of property held by it to or with the court having jurisdiction of the probate proceedings relating to the decedent’s estate, or if proceedings have not been commenced, to or with the court located in the judicial district of the decedent’s residence. The court shall hold the funds or item of property and, upon its determination under AS

13.12.211(d)

, shall order disbursement in accordance with the determination. If a petition is not filed in the court within the specified time under AS

13.12.211(a)

or, if filed, the demand for an elective share is withdrawn under AS

13.12.211(c)

, the court shall order disbursement to the designated beneficiary. Payments or transfers to the court or deposits made into court discharge the payor or other third party from all claims for amounts so paid or the value of property so transferred or deposited.

Upon petition to the court by the beneficiary designated in a governing instrument, a court may order that all or part of the property paid or transferred into court under (b) of this section be paid to the beneficiary in an amount and subject to conditions consistent with AS

13.12.201

—

13.12.214

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 75 SLA 1996)